Tennessee, session 114, HB1218.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 67, Chapter 6, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
67-6-359.
(a) There is exempt from the tax imposed by this chapter the sale or use of
menstrual hygiene products.
(b) As used in this section, "menstrual hygiene product":
(1) Means a product to be used by women with respect to menstruation
or other genital-tract secretions; and
(2) Includes tampons, pads, liners, cups, and douches, whether any such
products are reusable or disposable.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1218
002967
- 1 -